Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-171
Board; advisory committee or body; compensation; limitation; expenses.

Each member of a board shall, in addition to necessary traveling and lodging expenses, receive a per diem for each day actually engaged in the discharge of his or her duties, including compensation for the time spent in traveling to and from the place of conducting business. Traveling and lodging expenses shall be on the same basis as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The compensation per day shall not exceed fifty dollars and shall be determined by each board with the approval of the department. Persons serving on an advisory committee or body under section 38-161 shall receive remuneration of expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177, including compensation for time spent in traveling to and from the place of conducting business, and a per diem of fifty dollars.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 22, p. 459;

Laws 1929, c. 161, § 1, p. 556;

C.S.1929, § 71-312;

Laws 1935, c. 142, § 32, p. 531;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-312;

R.S.1943, § 71-122;

Laws 1955, c. 270, § 1, p. 849;

Laws 1957, c. 298, § 11, p. 1079;

Laws 1959, c. 318, § 1, p. 1165;

Laws 1961, c. 337, § 7, p. 1053;

Laws 1965, c. 410, § 1, p. 1315;

Laws 1967, c. 438, § 1, p. 1347;

Laws 1967, c. 439, § 16, p. 1364;

Laws 1969, c. 561, § 1, p. 2287;

Laws 1971, LB 587, § 5;

Laws 1972, LB 1385, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 9;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 12;

Laws 1981, LB 451, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 108;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 13;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 10;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 27;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-122;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 71.